Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.675

Agency employee records—Lists of names.

A state agency may not disclose lists of the names of agency employees, as defined under RCW 42.56.660, maintained by the agency in order to administer RCW 42.56.660.

[ 2019 c 373 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—2019 c 373: See notes following RCW 42.56.660.